New York, session 2025-2026, A7209.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 88 of the highway law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 12-a to read as follows: 3 12-a. (a) The commissioner shall develop and implement, upon federal 4 approval if necessary, an official business directional sign program to 5 provide directional information regarding the presence of publicly 6 available zero-emission vehicle charging and refueling stations, subject 7 to amounts appropriated therefor. Such program may be incorporated into 8 the official business directional sign program implemented by the 9 commissioner pursuant to subdivision twelve of this section. The offi- 10 cial business zero-emission vehicle station directional sign program 11 guidelines shall include the installation and maintenance of signage 12 designating where publicly accessible zero-emission vehicle charging and 13 refueling stations are located within three miles of an interstate or 14 primary highway system exit or off-ramp in accordance with the manual on 15 uniform traffic control devices. 16 (b) The official business zero-emission vehicle station directional 17 sign program shall be integrated with, but not limited by, information 18 centers provided for in subdivision ten of this section to maximize the 19 information made available in the specific interest of the traveling 20 public. 21 (c) The installation of zero-emission vehicle charging and refueling 22 station signage shall only occur during the regular course of mainte- 23 nance for existing signage. The commissioner shall seek to speed federal EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09365-03-5 A. 7209--A 2 1 approval of the official business zero-emission vehicle directional sign 2 program if such approval is necessary. 3 (d) For purposes of this section "zero-emission vehicle" shall mean a 4 motor vehicle that is propelled by an electric motor and associated 5 power electronics which provide acceleration torque to the drive wheels 6 during normal vehicle operation and draws electricity from a hydrogen 7 fuel cell or from a battery which is capable of being recharged from an 8 external source of electricity; or otherwise operates without direct 9 emission of atmospheric pollutants. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 11 have become a law and apply to signage installed or maintained by the 12 department of transportation on or after such effective date.